Maryland, session 2026, HB0239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
1–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0239*

HOUSE BILL 239
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Adaptive reuse” means a change granted by a legislative body under § 4–207
of this article to the use restrictions in a zoning classification, as those restrictions are
applied to a particular improved property.
(c) “Charter county” means a county that has adopted charter home rule under
Article XI–A of the Maryland Constitution.
(d) “Code county” means a county that has adopted code home rule under Article
XI–F of the Maryland Constitution.
(e) “County” means a county of the State or Baltimore City.
(f) (1) “Development” means an activity that materially affects the existing
condition or use of any land or structure.
(2) “Development” does not include a normal agricultural activity.
(g) (1) “Legislative body” means the elected body of a local jurisdiction.
(2) “Legislative body” includes:
(i) the board of county commissioners;
(ii) the county council; and
(iii) the governing body of a municipal corporation.
(h) (1) “Local executive” means the chief executive of a local jurisdiction.
(2) “Local executive” includes:
(i) the board of county commissioners;
(ii) the county executive;
(iii) the executive head; and
(iv) the mayor.
(i) “Local jurisdiction” means a county or municipal corporation and the territory
within which its powers may be exercised.
(j) (1) “Local law” means an enactment of the legislative body of a local
jurisdiction, whether by ordinance, resolution, or otherwise.

HOUSE BILL 239 3
(2) “Local law” does not include a public local law.
(k) “Person” means an individual, receiver, trustee, guardian, personal
representative, fiduciary, representative of any kind, partnership, firm, association,
corporation, limited liability company, or other entity.
(l) (1) “Plan” means the policies, statements, goals, and interrelated plans for
private and public land use, transportation, and community facilities documented in texts
and maps that constitute the guide for an area’s future development.
(2) “Plan” includes a general plan, master plan, comprehensive plan,
functional plan, or community plan adopted in accordance with Subtitle 4 of this title and
Title 3 of this article.
(m) “Priority funding area” has the meaning stated in § 5–7B–02 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
(n) (1) “Regulation” means a rule of general applicability and future effect.
(2) “Regulation” includes a map or plan.
(o) “Sensitive area” includes:
(1) a stream or wetland, and its buffers;
(2) a 100–year flood plain;
(3) a habitat of a threatened or endangered species;
(4) a steep slope;
(5) agricultural or forest land intended for resource protection or
conservation; and
(6) any other area in need of special protection, as determined in a plan.
(p) “Special exception” means a grant of a specific use that:
(1) would not be appropriate generally or without restriction; and
(2) shall be based on a finding that:
(i) the requirements of the zoning law governing the special
exception on the subject property are satisfied; and
(ii) the use on the subject property is consistent with the plan and is
compatible with the existing neighborhood.

HOUSE BILL 239
(q) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, “state” means:
(i) a state, possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United
States; or
(ii) the District of Columbia.
(2) When capitalized, “State” means Maryland.
(r) (1) “Subdivision” means:
(i) the process and configuration of land by which one or more lots,
tracts, or parcels of land are divided, consolidated, or established as one or more lots or
parcels, or other divisions of land, consistent with criteria established by the legislative
body of the local jurisdiction; or
(ii) the land so subdivided.
(2) “Subdivision” includes resubdivision.
(s) “TOWN HOUSE” MEANS A DWELLING UNIT CONSTRUCTED IN A ROW OF
THREE OR MORE ATTACHED DWELLING UNITS, WHERE EACH DWELLING UNIT:
(1) SHARES AT LEAST ONE COMMON WALL WITH AN ADJACENT
DWELLING UNIT; AND
(2) (I) IS LOCATED ON AN INDIVIDUAL LOT OR PARCEL; OR
(II) IS SUBJECT TO A CONDOMINIUM REGIME ESTABLISHED
UNDER TITLE 11 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(T) “Variance” means a modification only of density, bulk, dimensional, or area
requirements in the zoning law that is not contrary to the public interest, and where, owing
to conditions peculiar to the property and not because of any action taken by the applicant,
a literal enforcement of the zoning law would result in unnecessary hardship or practical
difficulty, as specified in the zoning law.
[(t)] (U) (1) “Zoning law” means the legislative implementation of
regulations for zoning by a local jurisdiction.
(2) “Zoning law” includes a zoning ordinance, zoning regulation, zoning
code, and any similar legislative action to implement zoning controls in a local jurisdiction.
1–401.

HOUSE BILL 239 5
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to charter
counties.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(1) this subtitle, including Parts II and III (Charter county –
Comprehensive plans);
(2) § 1–101(l), (m), and (o) (Definitions – “Plan”, “Priority funding area”,
and “Sensitive area”);
(3) § 1–201 (Visions);
(4) § 1–206 (Required education);
(5) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(6) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(7) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 5 (Growth Tiers);
(9) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle parking);
(10) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(11) § 4–104(E) (LIMITATIONS – SINGLE–FAMILY HOMES);
(12) § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
[(12)] (13) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
[(13)] (14) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating
systems);
[(14)] (15) § 4–212 (Agritourism);
[(15)] (16) § 4–213 (Alcohol production);
[(16)] (17) § 4–214 (Agricultural alcohol production);
[(17)] (18) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
[(18)] (19) § 4–216 (Limitations – Family child care homes and large family
child care homes);

HOUSE BILL 239
[(19)] (20) Title 4, Subtitle 5 (Accessory Dwelling Units);
[(20)] (21) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
[(21)] (22) § 5–104 (Major subdivision – Review);
[(22)] (23) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
[(23)] (24) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
[(24)] (25) except in Montgomery County or Prince George’s County, Title
7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities Agreements);
[(25)] (26) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
[(26)] (27) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability);
[(27)] (28) § 8–401 (Conversion of overhead facilities);
[(28)] (29) for Baltimore County only, Title 9, Subtitle 3 (Single–County
Provisions – Baltimore County);
[(29)] (30) for Frederick County only, Title 9, Subtitle 10 (Single–County
Provisions – Frederick County);
[(30)] (31) for Howard County only, Title 9, Subtitle 13 (Single–County
Provisions – Howard County);
[(31)] (32) for Talbot County only, Title 9, Subtitle 18 (Single–County
Provisions – Talbot County); and
[(32)] (33) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
(c) This section supersedes any inconsistent provision of Division II of this article.
4–102.
To promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the community, a legislative
body may, SUBJECT TO THE OTHER PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE, regulate:
(1) the height, number of stories, and size of buildings and other structures;
(2) the percentage of a lot that may be occupied;
(3) off–street parking;

HOUSE BILL 239 7
(4) the size of yards, courts, and other open spaces;
(5) population density; and
(6) the location and use of buildings, signs, structures, and land.
4–103.
(a) When zoning or rezoning land under this division, a legislative body may,
SUBJECT TO THE OTHER PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE, impose any additional
conditions or limitations that the legislative body considers appropriate to improve or
protect the general character and design of:
(1) the land and improvements being zoned or rezoned; or
(2) the surrounding or adjacent land and improvements.
(b) A municipal corporation may include in an annexation agreement conditions
and limitations on the use of land and density of development otherwise allowed in the
zoning district where the land is located.
(c) When zoning or rezoning land under this division, to ensure conformity with
the intent and purpose of this division and of the local jurisdiction’s zoning law, a legislative
body may retain the power to approve or disapprove, SUBJECT TO THE OTHER
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) the design of buildings, construction, landscaping, or other
improvements; and
(2) the changes made or to be made on the land being zoned or rezoned.
(d) The powers provided in this section shall apply only if the legislative body
adopts a local law that includes:
(1) enforcement procedures; and
(2) requirements for adequate notice of:
(i) public hearings; and
(ii) conditions or limitations sought to be imposed.
4–104.

HOUSE BILL 239
(E) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “AREA ZONED FOR SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENTIAL USE”
MEANS AN AREA IN WHICH THE CONSTRUCTION AND PLACEMENT OF DETACHED
SINGLE–FAMILY HOMES IS ALLOWED BY RIGHT UNDER LOCAL LAW.
(III) “IMPROVED LOT” MEANS A LOT OR PARCEL ON WHICH A
RESIDENTIAL STRUCTURE IS LOCATED.
(IV) “LEGISLATIVE BODY” INCLUDES:
1. THE MARYLAND–NATIONAL CAPITAL PARK AND
PLANNING COMMISSION; AND
2. ANY OTHER LOCAL BODY WITH AUTHORITY TO
CREATE OR MODIFY ZONING REGULATIONS OR DESIGN LIMITATIONS FOR
RESIDENTIAL USE.
(V) “SINGLE–FAMILY HOME” MEANS:
1. A STANDALONE RESIDENTIAL STRUCTURE THAT IS
INTENDED FOR OCCUPANCY BY ONE HOUSEHOLD AND HAS A PRIVATE ENTRANCE, A
KITCHEN, AND BATHROOM FACILITIES; OR
2. A TOWN HOUSE.
(2) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY TO:
(I) AN AREA THAT WAS DESIGNATED AS PART OF A HISTORIC
DISTRICT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–105 OF THIS ARTICLE ON OR BEFORE JULY 1,
2025;
(II) AGRICULTURAL LAND, AS DEFINED IN § 9–206 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE; OR
(III) CONSERVATION PROPERTY, AS DEFINED IN § 8–209.1 OF
THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, A LEGISLATIVE BODY MAY
NOT ADOPT OR ENFORCE ANY CODE, ORDINANCE, REGULATION, STANDARD, OR
OTHER REQUIREMENT THAT ESTABLISHES, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY:

HOUSE BILL 239 9
(I) IN AREAS CONNECTED OR PLANNED TO BE CONNECTED TO
PUBLIC WATER AND SEWER SYSTEMS, A MINIMUM LOT SIZE GREATER THAN 5,000
SQUARE FEET FOR LOTS ON WHICH A SINGLE–FAMILY HOME MAY BE LOCATED;
(II) MINIMUM SQUARE FOOTAGE OR EXTERIOR DIMENSION
REQUIREMENTS FOR A SINGLE–FAMILY HOME;
(III) LOT COVERAGE MAXIMUMS FOR A SINGLE–FAMILY HOME
AND ANY ACCESSORY STRUCTURES;
(IV) MINIMUM BUILDING SETBACKS FOR A SINGLE–FAMILY
HOME AND ANY ACCESSORY STRUCTURES GREATER THAN:
1. FOR FRONT AND REAR SETBACKS, 10 FEET; AND
2. FOR SIDE SETBACKS, 5 FEET; OR
(V) DESIGN, ARCHITECTURAL, OR AESTHETIC ELEMENTS FOR A
SINGLE–FAMILY HOME.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, A LEGISLATIVE BODY MAY
NOT ADOPT OR ENFORCE ANY CODE, ORDINANCE, REGULATION, STANDARD, OR
OTHER REQUIREMENT THAT PROHIBITS, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, THE
PLACEMENT OF TOWN HOUSES IN AN AREA ZONED FOR SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENTIAL USE.
(5) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH AND NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, A LEGISLATIVE BODY MAY
NOT ADOPT OR ENFORCE ANY CODE, ORDINANCE, REGULATION, STANDARD, OR
OTHER REQUIREMENT THAT PROHIBITS THE OWNER OF AN IMPROVED LOT IN AN
AREA ZONED FOR SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENTIAL USE FROM SUBDIVIDING THE LOT
INTO THREE OR FEWER SMALLER LOTS THAT CONFORM TO LOCAL LAW.
(II) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO AN IMPROVED LOT
CREATED BY SUBDIVISION WITHIN THE PRECEDING 3 YEARS.
(6) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) DO NOT SUPERSEDE APPLICABLE BUILDING CODES, FIRE
CODES, OR PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY REGULATIONS THAT ARE NECESSARY TO
ADDRESS IMMEDIATE THREATS TO PUBLIC SAFETY; AND

HOUSE BILL 239
(II) APPLY TO A LEGISLATIVE BODY ONLY TO THE EXTENT THAT
THEY DO NOT CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL LAWS OR REGULATIONS.
10–103.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to Baltimore
City.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to Baltimore City:
(1) this title;
(2) § 1–101(m) (Definitions – “Priority funding area”);
(3) § 1–101(o) (Definitions – “Sensitive area”);
(4) § 1–201 (Visions);
(5) § 1–206 (Required education);
(6) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(7) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(9) Title 1, Subtitle 4, Parts II and III (Home Rule Counties –
Comprehensive Plans; Implementation);
(10) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle parking);
(11) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(12) § 4–104(E) (LIMITATIONS – SINGLE–FAMILY HOMES);
(13) § 4–205 (Administrative adjustments);
[(13)] (14) § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
[(14)] (15) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
[(15)] (16) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating
systems);
[(16)] (17) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);

HOUSE BILL 239 11
[(17)] (18) § 4–216 (Limitations – Family child care homes and large family
child care homes);
[(18)] (19) Title 4, Subtitle 5 (Accessory Dwelling Units);
[(19)] (20) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
[(20)] (21) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
[(21)] (22) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
[(22)] (23) Title 7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities
Agreements);
[(23)] (24) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
[(24)] (25) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability); and
[(25)] (26) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
10–202.
To promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the community, the Mayor and
City Council of Baltimore City may, SUBJECT TO THE OTHER PROVISIONS OF THIS
DIVISION, regulate:
(1) the height, number of stories, and size of buildings and other structures;
(2) the percentage of a lot that may be occupied;
(3) off–street parking;
(4) the size of yards, courts, and other open spaces;
(5) population density; and
(6) the location and use of buildings, signs, structures, and land.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.